Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. In General

§ 41-4-101.
Legal standard of measurement.

A cubic foot of water per second of time shall be the legal standard for the measurement of water in this state, both for the purpose of determining the flow of water in natural streams, and for the purpose of distributing water therefrom.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 38; R.S. 1899, § 968; C.S. 1910, § 742; C.S. 1920, § 862; R.S. 1931, § 122-431; C.S. 1945, § 71-251; W.S. 1957, § 41-148.

Cited

in

Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 41-4-102.
Copies of records as evidence.

Copies of papers, books, records and maps, on file and deposited by virtue of any law, in the office of the state engineer or state board of control, and certified by the state engineer or secretary of the state board of control, shall be competent evidence in the courts and have the same force and effect as the originals would if produced.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 24, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 798; C.S. 1920, § 919; R.S. 1931, § 122-140; C.S. 1945, § 71-263; W.S. 1957, § 41-149.

§ 41-4-103.
Cooperation and agreements with Utah; appropriations to Montana.

The state engineer is hereby authorized and empowered to receive and grant applications to appropriate water from streams in Wyoming where such water is to be conveyed and used for beneficial purposes within the state of Utah, and the board of control is hereby authorized and empowered to issue certificates of appropriation under such permits as may be granted by the state engineer of Wyoming upon certification from the state engineer of Utah that the waters appropriated have been put to beneficial uses set forth in the permits. The state engineer and the board of control of Wyoming are also authorized and empowered to cooperate with the state engineer of Utah in the determination, supervision, regulation and control of all water and water rights on all interstate streams; and to these ends the state engineer and board of control of Wyoming, by and with the consent of the governor, may enter into the necessary agreements with the state engineer of Utah to carry out the purposes of this section; provided, that such agreements are not in conflict with the provisions of the irrigation laws now in force in this state; provided, further, that such authority shall not be exercised by the state engineer or board of control until after the state of Utah has passed a law granting its state engineer like authority to that granted to the state engineer and board of control of Wyoming by this section. The state engineer is further authorized and empowered to receive and grant applications to appropriate water from the Little Missouri River in Wyoming where such water is to be conveyed and used for beneficial purposes within the state of Montana, and the board of control is hereby authorized and empowered to issue certificates of appropriation under such permits as may be granted by the state engineer of the state of Wyoming, upon certification from the state of Montana that the waters appropriated have been put to beneficial uses set forth in the permit. Provided that the granting of any such permit for application to beneficial uses in the state of Montana shall in no manner impair or injure any existing water rights in the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 47, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-432; Laws 1939, ch. 96, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-264; W.S. 1957, § 41-150.

Cross references. —

As to rights to foreign waters, see §§

41-3-201

through

41-3-215

.

As to interstate streams commission, see §§

41-11-201

through

41-11-206

.

As to various interstate river compacts, see chapter 12 of this title.

§ 41-4-104.
Adjudication of rights to water for use in adjoining state.

After issuance of the permit under legislative authority and completion of the work according to the terms of the permit, the board of control may adjudicate said water rights upon proof of beneficial use as provided by W.S.

41-4-511

.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 88, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-266; W.S. 1957, § 41-152.

Editor's notes. —

The permit referred to above was for the use of water to be diverted or stored in Wyoming for use in an adjoining state. The statutory requisites for the permit were enacted in § 1, ch. 88, Laws 1945 [§ 41-151, W.S. 1957] and repealed by § 2, ch. 25, Laws 1974.

Authorization to approve the application to divert and appropriate water for use in an adjoining state, and authorization to adjudicate water rights in conformity with § 41-151, W.S. 1957, and this section has been given in the following acts:

Laws 1949, ch. 53.

Application of Garden Water Co., Driggs, Idaho, to divert water from Darby Creek, to irrigate land in Idaho.

Laws 1951, ch. 77.

Application of Squirrel Creek Irrigation Co., Ashton, Idaho, to store water from Indian Lake, for irrigation of land in Idaho.

Laws 1953, ch. 96.

Applications of Squirrel Creek Irrigation Co., Ashton, Idaho, to store water from Indian Lake Creek in Bergman Lake Reservoir, for irrigation of land in Idaho.

Laws 1953, ch. 195.

Applications of John and Peter Etcheverry, Cokeville, Wyo., to store water from Thomas Fork Creek in Thomas Fork Reservoir, for irrigation of land in Idaho.

Laws 1955, ch. 31.

Application of Harold Brower, Freedom, Wyo., to divert water from Tin Cup Creek, for irrigation of land in Idaho.

Laws 1955, ch. 32.

Application of Boone Creek Canal Co., of Idaho, to divert water from Boone Creek, for use on land in Idaho.

Laws 1955, ch. 63.

Application of Arthur Barker to construct Barker Reservoir and store water from Sage Creek, for irrigation of land in Wyoming and Utah.

Laws 1955, ch. 86.

Applications of John and Peter Etcheverry, Cokeville, Wyo., to store water from Thomas Fork Creek in enlargement of Thomas Fork Reservoir, for irrigation of land in Idaho.

Laws 1955, ch. 106.

Application of Joseph W. Peacock, Driggs, Idaho, to divert water from Teton Creek, for irrigation of land in Idaho.

Laws 1957, ch. 33.

Application of Boone Creek Canal Co., of Idaho, to store water from South Fork of Boone Creek and North Squirrel Creek, for irrigation of land in Idaho and other uses.

Laws 1957, ch. 103.

Application of Alta Community Pipe Line Co. to deliver for use in Idaho a portion of an appropriation of water from Teton Creek.

Laws 1957, ch. 104.

Applications for permits to divert water for domestic purposes in that part of Spring Creek community located in Idaho.

Laws 1961, ch. 140.

Application of Joseph M. Peacock, Driggs, Idaho, to divert water from Teton Creek, tributary of Teton River, through the enlargement of the Brown-Clement Ditch, for irrigation of land in Idaho.

Laws 1965, ch. 64.

Application of Peter and John Etcheverry to divert and appropriate the underground water of the state for the original and supplemental irrigation of lands in Idaho, and for other beneficial uses.

Laws 1965, ch. 65.

Application of the Bauman Ranch to divert and appropriate the underground water of the state for the irrigation of lands in Colorado.

Laws 1973, ch. 94.

Application of the Blake Ranch to divert and appropriate the surface water of the state for the irrigation of lands in Colorado.

As to permit for reservoir with the damsite in Crook county known as the McKean or Carlisle damsite, see note to §

41-12-201

.

Water rights perfected by filing of application for permit. —

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 3.

§ 41-4-105.
Adjudication of rights to water for use in adjoining state; permits issued before February 25, 1939.

Where ditches or reservoirs have been built under permits issued by the state of Wyoming prior to February 25, 1939, and where water has been diverted by, or stored in such works and applied to beneficial use thereunder in an adjoining state, and where such state as a matter of policy grants reciprocal rights to divert and store water in such state for use in Wyoming, the state board of control shall by this act [§§

41-4-104

,

41-4-105

], be authorized to proceed with the adjudication of said water rights for use of the water in the state in which the same has been applied to a beneficial use and issue certificates of appropriation therefor, as provided by the statutes of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 88, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-267; W.S. 1957, § 41-153.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1945, ch. 88, § 4, reads: “Chapter 125, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1939, and all acts or parts of acts inconsistent or in conflict herewith are hereby repealed.” Chapter 125, Laws 1939, dealt with the same subject matter as ch. 88, Laws 1945.

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 3.